Maine, session 132, LD1767.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 30-A MRSA §853, sub-§1, ¶A, as enacted by PL 1987, c. 737, Pt. A, §2
and Pt. C, §106 and amended by PL 1989, c. 6; c. 9, §2; and c. 104, Pt. C, §§8 and 10, is
further amended to read:
A. The county commissioners shall notify all municipal officers in the county to caucus
by county commissioner districts at a specified date, time and place for the purpose of
nominating at least one municipal officer from each district as a candidate for the
county budget committee; except that in 1987, at least 3 municipal officers shall must
be nominated from each district. If no municipal officer in a county commissioner
district is willing to be nominated as a candidate for the county budget committee, any
resident of the county commissioner district who is of voting age may be nominated in
place of the municipal officer as long as the other 2 county budget committee members
in the county commissioner district are municipal officers. A county commissioner
shall serve as nonvoting moderator for his that county commissioner's district's caucus.
Nominations shall must be received from the floor. The nominee receiving the most
votes shall must be approved. Any other nominees who receive a majority vote of
those present shall must also be approved. The names of those duly approved shall
must be recorded and forwarded to the county commissioners to be placed on a written
ballot.
Sec. 2. 30-A MRSA §853, sub-§3, as enacted by PL 1987, c. 737, Pt. A, §2 and
Pt. C, §106 and amended by PL 1989, c. 6; c. 9, §2; and c. 104, Pt. C, §§8 and 10, is further
amended to read:
3. Term of office. The term of office shall be is 3 years, provided that a budget
committee member remains a municipal officer in the municipal officer's municipality,
except that of those elected in 1987, one from each district shall be elected for a term of 3
years; one from each district shall be elected for a term of 2 years; and one from each
district shall be elected for a term of one year.
Sec. 3. 30-A MRSA §853, sub-§4, as amended by PL 2017, c. 78, §1, is further
amended to read:
4. Vacancies. A vacancy occurring on the budget committee must be filled by the
committee for the balance of the unexpired term. The person appointed to fill the vacant
office must be a municipal officer resident of voting age from the same municipality as the
person vacating the office. If the municipality of the person vacating the office declines to
send a new member, the committee may solicit another municipality in the same district as
the municipality of the vacating member that does not have a member sitting on the
committee to send a municipal officer municipal resident of voting age to fill the vacancy.
Sec. 4. 30-A MRSA §855, sub-§4, as enacted by PL 1987, c. 737, Pt. A, §2 and
Pt. C, §106 and amended by PL 1989, c. 6; c. 9, §2; and c. 104, Pt. C, §§8 and 10, is
repealed.
Sec. 5. 30-A MRSA §855, sub-§4-A is enacted to read:
4-A. Adoption of budget. After the public hearing is completed, the budget
committee shall adopt a final budget and transmit that budget to the county commissioners.
The county commissioners may not increase, decrease, alter or revise the budget as adopted
Page 1 - 132LR1610(01)

414 by the budget committee except by unanimous vote of the county commissioners. If the
425 adopted budget is changed by the county commissioners, the budget committee may reject
436 that change by a 2/3 vote of its membership. Those actions are final and are not subject to
447 further action by either the county commissioners or the budget committee. The budget as
458 adopted must be sent to the county commissioners, and the county tax authorized must be
469 apportioned and collected in accordance with section 706.